New York, session 2025-2026, A5083.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Short title. This act shall be known and may be cited as 2 the "NYCHA utility accountability act". 3 § 2. Section 402-e of the public housing law is amended by adding a 4 new subdivision 6 to read as follows: 5 6. Where there is a disruption in the New York city housing authori- 6 ty's provision of heat, water, gas, or electricity service to any 7 tenant, the New York city housing authority shall, at a minimum, reduce 8 the amount of rent to be paid by such tenant for the following month by 9 the greater of either (a) seventy-five dollars per month, on a prorated 10 daily basis for each day such tenant experienced a disruption of heat, 11 water, gas, or electricity service; or (b) the amount equal to ten 12 percent of such tenant's prorated daily cost of rent for each day such 13 tenant experienced a disruption of heat, water, gas, or electricity 14 service. 15 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00820-01-5